Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 7. General Provisions.

Sec. 45.48.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,

“consumer” means an individual;

“consumer credit reporting agency” means a person who, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages, in whole or in part, in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing credit reports to third parties;

“credit report” means a consumer report that a consumer credit reporting agency furnishes to a person that the consumer credit reporting agency has reason to believe intends to use the consumer report as a factor in establishing the consumer’s eligibility for credit to be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes; in this paragraph, “consumer report” has the meaning given to “consumer report” in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(d) (Fair Credit Reporting Act), except that “consumer reporting agency” in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(d) is to be read as “consumer credit reporting agency”;

“Fair Credit Reporting Act” means 15 U.S.C. 1681 — 1681x;

“Gramm-Leach-Bliley Financial Modernization Act” means 15 U.S.C. 6801 — 6827;

“identity theft” means the theft of the identity of an individual;

“information system” means any information system, including a system consisting of digital databases and a system consisting of pieces of paper;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

and includes a state or local governmental agency, except for an agency of the judicial branch;

“state resident” means an individual who satisfies the residency requirements under AS

01.10.055

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Personal Information Protection Act.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)